sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll > Amerikansk fotboll träningsredskap > Amerikansk fotboll målgubbar & motstånd: Amerikansk fotboll målgubbar; Amerikansk fotboll motstånd
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมอเมริกันฟุตบอล > หุ่นจำลองและแท่นเลื่อนอเมริกันฟุตบอล: หุ่นจำลองอเมริกันฟุตบอล; แท่นเลื่อนอเมริกันฟุตบอล
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball > Amerikaifutball-edzőfelszerelés > Amerikaifutball-babák és -szánkók: Amerikaifutball-babák; Amerikaifutball-szánkók
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal > Tréninková výstroj pro americký fotbal > Tréninkové figuríny a sáně pro americký fotbal: Tréninkové figuríny pro americký fotbal; Sáně pro americký fotbal
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american > Echipament de antrenament pentru fotbal american > Manechine și sănii pentru fotbal american: Manechine pentru fotbal american; Sănii pentru fotbal american
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal > Tréningové vybavenie pre americký futbal > Figuríny a prekážky na americký futbal: Figuríny na americký futbal; Prekážky na americký futbal
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano > Equipo de entrenamiento de fútbol americano > Muñecos y trineos de fútbol americano: Muñecos de fútbol americano; Trineos de fútbol americano
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球 > 美式足球訓練器材 > 美式足球假人及負重雪橇: 美式足球假人; 美式足球負重雪橇
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Harjoitteluvarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Nuket ja kelkat, amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Nuket, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Kelkat, amerikkalainen jalkapallo
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano > Equipamento de Treino de Futebol Americano > Trenós e Bonecos de Futebol Americano: Manequins de Futebol Americano; Trenós de Futebol Americano
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet > Oprema za vadbo ameriškega nogometa > Vadbene lutke in sani za ameriški nogomet: Vadbene lutke za ameriški nogomet; Vadbene sani za ameriški nogomet
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold > Amerikansk fodbold – træningsudstyr > Amerikansk fodbold – dummies og sleds: Amerikansk fodbold – dummies; Amerikansk fodbold – sleds
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet > Oprema za trening američkog nogometa > Dummy lutke i sanjke za američki nogomet: Dummy lutke za američki nogomet; Sanjke za američki nogomet
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール > アメリカンフットボール用トレーニング機器 > アメリカンフットボール用ダミー&ソリ: アメリカンフットボール用ダミー; アメリカンフットボール用ソリ
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football > Trainingsausrüstung für American Football > Dummies und Schlitten für American Football: Dummies für American Football; Schlitten für American Football
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football > American Football Training Equipment > American Football Dummies & Sleds: American Football Dummies; American Football Sleds
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano > Equipamentos para treino de futebol americano > Bonecos e trenós de futebol americano: Bonecos de futebol americano; Trenós de futebol americano
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼 > 미식축구 훈련 장비 > 미식축구 인형 및 썰매: 미식축구 인형; 미식축구 썰매
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas > Amerikietiškojo futbolo treniruočių įranga > Amerikietiškojo futbolo manekenai ir rogutės: Amerikietiškojo futbolo manekenai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo rogutės
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański > Sprzęt treningowy do futbolu amerykańskiego > Manekiny i manekiny do przepychania do futbolu amerykańskiego: Manekiny do futbolu amerykańskiego; Manekiny do przepychania do futbolu amerykańskiego
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол > Тренировъчно оборудване за американски футбол > Тренировъчни манекени и шейни за американски футбол: Тренировъчни манекени за американски футбол; Тренировъчни мишени за американски футбол
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano > Attrezzatura da allenamento da football americano > Dummy e slitte da football americano: Manichini da football americano; Slitte da football americano
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball > Treningsutstyr for amerikansk fotball > Dukker og sleder for amerikansk fotball: Dukker for amerikansk fotball; Sleder for amerikansk fotball
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Trang thiết bị tập luyện bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Xe trượt và hình nộm tập bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Hình nộm tập bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Xe trượt tập bóng bầu dục Mỹ
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο > Προπονητικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου > Ομοιώματα & έλκηθρα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου: Ομοιώματα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Έλκηθρα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu > Amerikan Futbolu Antrenman Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu Kuklalar ve Kızaklı Kuklalar: Amerikan Futbolu Kuklaları; Amerikan Futbolu Kızaklı Kuklaları
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football > American Football trainingsmaterialen > American Football dummy's en sleden: American Football dummy's; American Football sleden
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球 > 美式橄榄球训练装备 > 美式橄榄球模型和雪橇: 美式橄榄球模型; 美式橄榄球滑车
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для американского футбола > Тренировочные манекены и сани для американского футбола: Тренировочные манекены для американского футбола; Тренировочные сани для американского футбола
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain > Équipement d'entraînement pour le football américain > Mannequins et sleds pour le football américain: Mannequins de football américain; Sleds de football américain